Oklahoma, session 2026, SB361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 732 of Title 59, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Culture” means a way of life of a group of people


including, but not limited to, the behaviors, beliefs, values,


customs, traditional practices, art, music, rituals, or ceremonies


specific to a people;


2. “Indigenous or traditional healing therapy” means any


healing art, practice, ritual, ceremony, or modality that has been



Req. No. 727 Page 1


historically performed or utilized by indigenous or native peoples


or traditional healing practitioners; and


3. “Traditional healing practitioner” means any individual with


a distinct culture, practice, belief, or healing system that is


practiced or performed to support wellness.


B. The Legislature intends, by its enactment of this section,


to protect and preserve by this state, unfettered public access to


all indigenous or traditional healing therapies and to protect and


preserve the right to practice and provide services according to


this section.


C. Notwithstanding any other state law or rule, a traditional


healing practitioner who does not hold a license, permit,


certification, or registration as a health care professional issued


by this state shall not be in violation of any health care


professional practice act or other law or rule if that individual or


agent provides care or treatment in compliance with subsection D of


this section and does not falsely represent himself or herself as a


licensed practitioner of medicine or other health care professional


as described in Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or fraudulently


use any title or degree appertaining to the licensed practice


thereof, or falsely claim any training, certification, or approval


of any organization that he or she does not have.


D. A traditional healing practitioner shall not:


1. Perform surgery, or any intravenous medical procedure;

Req. No. 727 Page 2


2. Set fractures;


3. Prescribe or administer x-ray or gamma ray radiation, or any


other radiation field not inherent to the human body;


4. Prescribe or administer a prescription drug or device, or


any controlled substance;


5. Recommend interruption or elimination of prescribed


medications or treatments;


6. Conventionally diagnose a medical disease;


7. Move joints beyond their normal range of motion; or


8. State, advertise, or otherwise falsely represent to any


individual that the person is licensed by, certified by, or


registered with this state to practice as a health care


professional.


E. Any person who fails to comply with this section may, as


provided by law, be subject to administrative action by the


appropriate licensing board, criminal prosecution, civil liability,


or any other remedies provided by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-727 DC 1/3/2025 5:07:05 PM









Req. No. 727 Page 3